Arkansas, session 2025, HB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-52-318(a), concerning the insurance
requirements for a home inspector, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) All home inspectors are A home inspector is required to carry
general liability insurance a professional liability insurance policy or an
errors and omissions insurance policy approved by the State Insurance
Department for the home inspections performed by the home inspector.
(2) Coverage limits shall be not less than one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000).


/s/Barnett





*ANS277*
03-13-2025 10:35:42 ANS277